FST/hsb/hsb_adj/phon_hsb_adj.xfst
define cons [j|w|ž|š];
define vows [y|a|i];

define nomNEUT vows -> e || _ "§",, "§" -> e || š _;

define nomSG vows -> e || _ ",",, "," -> a || n _;

define nomPL d n y -> d n e  || _ ".",, vows -> e || _ ".",, "," -> i || n _;

define nomFEM vows -> a || _ "$",, "$" -> a || š _;

define genMASC vows -> e h o || _ "&",, "&" -> o h o || n _,, "&" -> e h o || j _;

define accFEM vows -> a || _ "/",, "/" -> u || j _;

define accFEMPL vows -> u || _ "\";

define accNEUT vows -> e || _ "(";

define accMASC o w y -> o w e h o || _ "-",, z y -> z a || _ "-";

define accPL2 y -> e || _ ")",, ")" -> c h || i _;

define datSG2 vows -> e j || _ "=";

define datMASC y ž -> e m u ž || _ "?",, s k i -> š e m u || _ "?" ;

define genFEM vows -> e j e || _ "´",, w ó n -> j e j e || _ "´";

define locMASC ó n -> y m || _ "`",, ž -> m ž || _ "`";

define genMascPl s o k i -> š i c h || _ "°",, t ó n -> t y c h || _ "°";

define nomMasc e -> o || _ "@";

define clean [")"|"/"|"\"|"-"|"("|"="|"?"|"&"|"."|","|"§"|"$"|"´"|"`"|"°"|"@"] -> 0;

define all nomNEUT .o. nomSG .o. nomPL .o. nomFEM .o. genMASC .o. accFEM .o. accMASC .o. accFEMPL .o. accNEUT
 .o. accPL2 .o. datSG2 .o. datMASC .o. genFEM .o. locMASC .o. genMascPl .o. nomMasc .o. clean;

regex %+ADJ -> 0;
